Utah statutes.
65A-8-102.   State forester.

(1)  There is created the position of state forester to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(2)  The state forester shall be a graduate of an accredited school of forestry, technically and professionally competent, and experienced in administration.

(3)  The state forester shall be responsible to the director of the division.

(4)  In all matters pertaining to forestry and fire control in which the state recognizes a responsibility, the state forester shall be the official representative of the state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 136, 2007 General Session

